Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB190.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1426. Eating Disorder Awareness and Education.--(a) A school entity shall annually provide information regarding eating disorder awareness and education for pupils in grades six through twelve to parents, guardians and key school personnel. The information shall be consistent with the educational information and materials and recommendations established under this section.(b) A school entity shall provide the educational 12345678910111213141516171819 information and materials to parents, guardians and key school personnel annually via email, first class mail or on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) The department DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH , in conjunction with the Department of Health DEPARTMENT , shall develop educational information and materials and make recommendations for providing information regarding eating disorder awareness and education to parents, guardians and key school personnel.(d) The educational information and materials and recommendations shall:(1) Be developed with input from the Eating Disorders Advisory Committee established under this section.(2) Be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website in a variety of languages for dissemination to parents, guardians and key school personnel by school entities.(3) Explain the importance of eating disorder prevention education and resources for school entities and key school personnel.(4) List the warning signs, risk factors and resources about eating disorders.(e) The secretary shall establish the Eating Disorders Advisory Committee to offer recommendations to the department and the Department of Health concerning eating disorder awareness and education, including the types and warning signs of eating disorders, weight and body image disorder, excessive compulsive exercise and orthorexia nervosa.(f) The secretary shall appoint members to the Eating Disorders Advisory Committee from specialized organizations and entities, including the Pennsylvania School Boards Association, the Pennsylvania Association of School Administrators, the 20250HB0190PN0318 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 National Alliance for Eating Disorders, the Pennsylvania Association of School Nurses and Practitioners, the Pennsylvania Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the Pennsylvania Academy of Family Physicians, the International Association of Eating Disorders Professionals Foundation and the Academy for Eating Disorders.(g) Members of the Eating Disorders Advisory Committee shall serve without compensation.(h) During the first year after the establishment of the Eating Disorders Advisory Committee, the committee shall meet at least two times per school year at the call of the secretary or the secretary's designee, who shall serve as chairperson. The first meeting of the committee shall occur within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this section.(i) During subsequent years, the Eating Disorders Advisory Committee shall meet at least one time per school year to reassess the information provided to school entities and to parents.(j) The department shall make available the educational information and materials and recommendations developed under this section to school entities within one year after the establishment of the Eating Disorders Advisory Committee.(k) The department, the Department of Health and the Eating Disorders Advisory Committee shall identify and develop appropriate additions or revisions to the Commonwealth's school health regulations and materials related to the development of parent educational information, including guidance regarding the clear delineation of health information from other administrative documentation.(l) As used in this section, the following words and phrases 20250HB0190PN0318 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Key school personnel." Includes school principals, vice principals, school counselors and school psychologists."Nonpublic school." A school, other than a public school, within this Commonwealth:(1) in which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act; and(2) that meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. Ch. 21 Subch. V)."School entity." A school district, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school, intermediate unit or nonpublic school."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB0190PN0318 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718